Utah statutes.
48-3a-504.   Power of legal representative of deceased member.

If a member dies, the deceased member's legal representative may exercise:

(1)  the rights of a transferee provided in Subsection 48-3a-502(3); and

(2)  for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights the deceased member had under Section 48-3a-410.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

